Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-174.05
Violation of conditions of community supervision; penalty.

Failure to comply with the conditions of community supervision imposed by the department is a Class IV felony for the first offense and a Class III felony for any subsequent offense.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 91;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 138.